Maryland, session 2026, HB0493.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Courts and Judicial Proceedings
1–503.
(a) In each county in the first seven judicial circuits there shall be the number of
resident judges of the circuit court set forth below, including the judge or judges provided
for by the Constitution:
(18) St. Mary’s .......................................................................................... [3] 4
1–603.
(b) In each of the districts provided for in § 1–602 of this subtitle, there shall be
the following number of associate judges of the District Court:
(11) District 11 — [5] 6, three to be appointed from Frederick County and
[two] THREE to be appointed from Washington County
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.